Maryland, session 2026, HB0071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–103.9.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS REQUIRING THE PROGRAM
TO REIMBURSE A PSYCHIATRIC REHABILITATION PROGRAM FOR PSYCHIATRIC
REHABILITATION PROGRAM COMMUNITY PSYCHIATRIC SUPPORT SERVICES FOR A
MINIMUM OF 6 SERVICES AND A MAXIMUM OF 30 SERVICES PER MONTH FOR
SERVICES DELIVERED ON–SITE OR OFF–SITE TO AN INDIVIDUAL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0071*

HOUSE BILL 71
(1) WITH A SERIOUS EMOTIONAL DISTURBANCE OR A SERIOUS AND
PERSISTENT MENTAL DISORDER;
(2) WHOSE FUNCTIONING IS SEVERELY IMPAIRED; AND
(3) WHO IS LIVING WITH A PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR RELATIVE WHO IS
LEGALLY RESPONSIBLE FOR THE INDIVIDUAL’S CARE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Department of
Health shall adopt the regulations required under § 15–103.9 of the Health – General
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on or before December 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.